Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2610
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 39-2601 to 39-2612 shall be construed to abrogate or affect the provisions of any lawful ordinance, regulation, or resolution which is more restrictive than sections 39-2601 to 39-2612.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 10;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 32.